California statutes. Public Contract Code
In order to prevent fraud, waste, and abuse, the school district adopting job order contracting shall do all of the following:

(a) Prepare for each individual job order developed under a job order contract an independent school district estimate. The estimate will be prepared prior to the receipt of the contractor’s offer to perform work and will be compared to the contractor’s proposed price to determine the reasonableness of that price before issuance of any job order. The basis for any adjustments to the school district estimate is to be documented. In the event that the contractor’s proposal for a given job order is found to be unreasonable, not cost effective, or undesirable,
 the school district is under no obligation to issue the job order to the job order contractor, and may instead utilize any other available procurement procedures.

(b) The school district shall not issue a job order until the job order has been reviewed and approved by the appropriate level of management.

(c) Once a job order has been issued, all documents pertaining to preparation and approval of the job order, including the independent school district estimate, shall be available for public review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.32.

A school district that adopts the job order contracting process shall also adopt a payment resolution process which may include, but not be limited to, the convening of a payment resolution committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 20919.33.)
-------------------------------------------

20919.33.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 303, Sec. 4.   (AB 846)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 60.4, commencing with Section 20919.20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 60.5. Reclamation Districts [20920. - 20927.]

20920.

This article applies to contracts by reclamation districts formed under special acts of the Legislature or under Division 15 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Water Code or any district which is otherwise authorized to act under that division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1042, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20921.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, or for materials or supplies, in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be let to the lowest responsive, responsible bidder, except as otherwise provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1042, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20922.

It is unlawful to split or separate into smaller work orders or projects for the purpose of evading the provisions of this article requiring work to be done by contract after competitive bidding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1042, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20923.

The board shall advertise for bids by at least two insertions, not less than five days apart, in a newspaper of general circulation circulated within the district, or if there is none, shall post notice at least 10 days before the date of opening of bids in at least three public places in the district that have been designated by resolution of the district as the places for posting public notices. The notice inviting sealed bids shall state the proposed improvement or work and shall set a date for opening of bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1042, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20924.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever a district participates in any federal or state assistance program, the district shall comply with the procurement requirements of that program to the extent that the requirements are more restrictive than those set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1042, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20925.

The board shall have the right to reject any and all bids not suitable to the best interests of the district. In its discretion, the board may readvertise for new bids or negotiate an offered bid, if it is the sole bid received and the negotiated price does not exceed the offered bid for the work as advertised. If two or more bids are the same and are the lowest, the district board may accept the one it chooses. If no bids are received, the district board may proceed to complete the project by force account or contract without further compliance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1042, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20926.

(a) In the event of any emergency, the board may negotiate and award a contract for construction of work to prevent damage or repair damaged works without advertising for bids and expend any sum reasonably required in the emergency. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the board or any trustee authorizing or contracting for work in an emergency shall, if practicable, informally solicit bids or requests for proposals to seek to obtain the best terms possible, including the lowest price term, given the urgent circumstances of the emergency, and, promptly after the emergency ends, shall document the circumstances of the emergency and the bid or proposal accepted.

(c) Work to further reconstruct or rehabilitate damaged works after the emergency ends shall be subject to the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20927.

The limitations set forth in Section 20921 may be exceeded to a maximum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for projects and purchases of materials for projects for which no assistance from federal, state, or other local governmental agencies is requested, if that approval is secured from the landowners of the district representing at least two-thirds of the assessment valuation of the district, or if no assessment has been collected within the prior year, by the landowners representing at least two-thirds of the acreage within the district. The approval may be obtained either through a special election held for that purpose or by written consent of the approving landowners. The special election may be conducted by mail ballot.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1042, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 60.6. Surface Storage Projects [20928. - 20928.4.]

20928.

The Legislature finds and declares that alternative project delivery, using the best value procurement methodology, has been authorized for various agencies that have reported benefits from those projects, including reduced project costs, expedited project start and completion, simplified project controls and accountability, and design features that are not achievable through the traditional design-bid-build method.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 760, Sec. 1.   (AB 2551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

20928.1.

(a) A surface storage project identified in the CALFED Bay-Delta Program Record of Decision, dated August 28, 2000, that receives funding pursuant to Division 26.7 (commencing with Section 79700) of the Water Code may use, in addition to any other methods of project delivery otherwise allowable by irrigation districts, county water districts, or other similar water districts by law, the following methods of project delivery:

(1) Construction manager at-risk.

(2) Design-Build, including conventional, progressive, and target price.

(3) Design-build-operate.

(b) The contract shall be awarded on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 760, Sec. 1.   (AB 2551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

20928.2.

The procurement process for the project shall progress as follows:

(a) The local agency shall prepare a set of documents setting forth the scope and estimated price of the project. The documents may include, but need not be limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, workmanship, preliminary plans or building layouts, or any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the local agency’s needs. The performance specifications and any plans shall be prepared by a design professional who is duly licensed and registered in California.

(b) The local agency shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to prequalify or short-list the entities, including subcontractors and suppliers, whose bids shall be evaluated for final selection. The request for qualifications shall include, but need not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the local agency to evaluate bids, the procedure for final selection of the bidder, and any other information deemed necessary by the local agency to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the local agency reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design-related
 expertise, construction expertise, acceptable safety records, and all other nonprice-related factors.

(3) A standard template request for statements of qualifications prepared by the local agency. In preparing the standard template, the local agency may consult with the construction industry, the building trades and surety industry, and other local agencies interested in using the authorization provided by this article. The template shall require all of the following information:

(A) If the bidder is a privately held corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or joint venture, comprised of privately held entities, a listing of all of the shareholders, partners, or members known at the time of statement of qualification submission who will perform work on the project.

(B) Evidence that the members of the contracting team have completed, or demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete, projects of similar size, scope, or complexity and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the bidder has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required for the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the bidder has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding,
 liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(F) An acceptable safety record. “Safety record” means the prior history concerning the safe performance of construction contracts. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s safety record shall include, at a minimum, its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period.

(4) The information required under this subdivision shall be certified under penalty of perjury by the bidder and its general partners or joint venture members.

(c) A contracting entity shall not be prequalified or short-listed unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the local agency that the entity and its subcontractors will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades.

(1) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Apprenticeable occupation” means an occupation for which the chief had approved an apprenticeship program pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code prior to January 1, 2014.

(B) “Skilled and trained workforce” means a workforce that meets all of the following
 conditions:

(i) All the workers are either skilled journeypersons or apprentices registered in an apprenticeship program approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.

(ii) (I) For work performed on or after January 1, 2017, at least 30 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by the bidder and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that was either approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code or located outside California and approved for federal purposes pursuant to the apprenticeship regulations adopted by the federal Secretary of Labor.

(II) For work performed on or after January 1, 2018, at least 40 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by the bidder and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that was either approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code or located outside California and approved for federal purposes pursuant to the apprenticeship regulations adopted by the federal Secretary of Labor.

(III) For work performed on or after January 1, 2019, at least 50 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by the bidder and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates
 of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that was either approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code or located outside California and approved for federal purposes pursuant to the apprenticeship regulations adopted by the federal Secretary of Labor.

(IV) For work performed on or after January 1, 2020, at least 60 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by the bidder and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that was either approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code or located outside California and approved for federal purposes pursuant to the apprenticeship regulations
 adopted by the federal Secretary of Labor.

(iii) For an apprenticeable occupation in which no apprenticeship program had been approved by the chief prior to January 1, 1995, up to one-half of the graduation percentage requirements of clause (ii) may be satisfied by skilled journeypersons who commenced working in the apprenticeable occupation prior to the chief’s approval of an apprenticeship program for that occupation in the county in which the project is located.

(C) “Skilled journeyperson” means a worker who either:

(i) Graduated from an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that was approved by the chief or located outside California and approved for federal purposes pursuant to the apprenticeship
 regulations adopted by the federal Secretary of Labor.

(ii) Has at least as many hours of on-the-job experience in the applicable occupation as would be required to graduate from an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that is approved by the chief.

(2) The apprenticeship graduation percentage requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) are satisfied if, in a particular calendar month, either of the following is true:

(A) The required percentage of the skilled journeypersons employed by the contractor or subcontractor to perform work on the contract or project meet the graduation percentage requirement.

(B) For the hours of work
 performed by skilled journeypersons employed by the contractor or subcontractor on the contract or project, the percentage of hours performed by skilled journeypersons who met the graduation requirement meets or exceeds the required graduation percentage.

(3) A contractor or subcontractor need not meet the apprenticeship graduation requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) if, during the calendar month, the contractor or subcontractor employs skilled journeypersons to perform fewer than 10 hours of work on the contract or project.

(4) A subcontractor need not meet the apprenticeship graduation requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) if both of the following requirements are met:

(A) The
 subcontractor was not a listed subcontractor under Section 4104 or a substitute for a listed subcontractor.

(B) The subcontract does not exceed one-half of 1 percent of the price of the prime contract.

(5) (A) A contractor, bidder, or other entity’s commitment that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to perform the project or contract shall be established by the contractor, bidder, or other entity’s agreement with the local agency that the contractor, bidder, or other entity and its subcontractors at every tier will comply with this subdivision and that the contractor, bidder, or other entity will provide the local agency with a report on a monthly basis while the project or contract is being performed, as to whether the contractor, bidder, or other entity
 and its subcontractors are complying with the requirements of this subdivision.

(B) If the contractor, bidder, or other entity fails to provide the monthly report required by this section, or provides a report that is incomplete, the local agency shall withhold further payments until a complete report is provided.

(C) If a monthly report does not demonstrate compliance with this chapter, the local agency shall withhold further payments until the contractor, bidder, or other entity provides a plan to achieve substantial compliance with this article, with respect to the relevant apprenticeable occupation, prior to completion of the contract or project.

(D) A monthly report provided to the public agency or other awarding
 body shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public
 inspection.

(6) This subdivision shall not apply if the contractor, bidder, or other entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind itself and all its subcontractors who perform construction work on the project, and the contractor, bidder, or other entity agrees to be bound by the project agreement.

(d) The local agency shall make the list of prequalified entities available to the public.

(e) Based on the documents prepared as described in subdivision (a), the local agency shall prepare a request for bids that invites prequalified or short-listed entities to submit competitive sealed bids in the manner prescribed by the local agency. The request for bids shall include, but need not be
 limited to, all of the following elements:

(1) Identification of the basic scope and needs of the project or contract, the estimated cost to perform the work being requested, the methodology that will be used by the local agency to evaluate bids, whether the contract will be awarded on the basis of best value or to the lowest responsible bidder, and any other information deemed necessary by the local agency to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the local agency reasonably expects to consider in evaluating bids, including, but not limited to, cost or price and all nonprice-related factors.

(3) The relative importance or the weight assigned to each of the factors
 identified in the request for bids.

(4) If a best value selection method is used, the local agency may reserve the right to request bid revisions and hold discussions and negotiations with responsive bidders, in which case the local agency shall so specify in the request for bids and shall publish separately or incorporate into the request for bids applicable procedures to be observed by the local agency to ensure that any discussions or negotiations are conducted in good faith.

(f) For those projects utilizing low bid as the final selection method, the competitive bidding process shall, if appropriate for the delivery method, result in lump-sum bids by the prequalified or short-listed entities, and awards shall be made to the bidder that is the lowest responsible bidder.

(g) For those projects utilizing best value as a selection method, the competition shall progress as follows:

(1) Competitive bids shall be evaluated by using only the criteria and selection procedures specifically identified in the request for bids. The following minimum factors, however, shall be included, if applicable to the delivery method and weighted as deemed appropriate by the local agency:

(A) Price, unless a stipulated sum is specified and including financial and bonding capacity requirements.

(B) Technical design, procurement, and construction expertise.

(C) Proposed construction approach,
 sequencing, and methods.

(D) Compliance with the requirements of the owner-provided performance specification.

(E) Ability to meet the milestone schedule dates and, if applicable, any liquidated damages.

(F) Ability to meet the quality requirements.

(G) Proposed risk allocation and sharing.

(H) Safety record.

(I) Warranty.

(J) Life-cycle costs over 15 or more years as specified by the local agency.

(2) Pursuant
 to subdivision (e), the local agency may hold discussions or negotiations with responsive bidders using the process articulated in the local agency’s request for bids.

(3) When the evaluation is complete, the responsive bidders shall be ranked based on a determination of value provided by the local agency if no more than three bidders are required to be ranked.

(4) The award of the contract shall be made to the responsible bidder whose bid is determined by the local agency to have offered the best value to the public.

(5) Notwithstanding any provision of the Water Code, upon issuance of a contract award the local agency shall publicly announce its award, identifying the bidder to which the award is made, along
 with a statement regarding the basis of the award.

(6) The statement regarding the local agency’s contract award, described in paragraph (5), and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an external audit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 364.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

20928.3.

(a) The local agency, in each request for proposals, may identify specific types of subcontractors that must be included in the entity statement of qualifications and proposal.

(b) Following award of the contract, the entity shall proceed as follows in awarding construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the contract price allocable to construction work:

(1) Provide public notice of availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the local agency, including a fixed date and time on
 which qualification statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(2) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(3) Award the subcontract either on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder. The process may include prequalification or short-listing. The foregoing process does not apply to construction subcontractors listed in the original proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 760, Sec. 1.   (AB 2551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

20928.4.

Any project constructed pursuant to this article shall be subject to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 760, Sec. 1.   (AB 2551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 60.7. Water District Contract Bids [20929. - 20929.]

20929.

All bids for construction work requested by an agency or district covered by this chapter shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash. 

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the agency or district. 

(c) A certified check made payable to the agency or district. 

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the agency or district. 

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the agency or district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 20920 (as amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808) by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 125.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Water District Acts [20930. - 21641.]



  ARTICLE 61. Levee District No. 1 of Sutter County [20930. - 20931.]

20930.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by Levee District No. 1 of Sutter County, as provided for in Chapter 349 of the Statutes of 1873–74.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

20931.

(a) The board shall annually have prepared, and shall adopt, plans and specifications of all necessary repairs to the levees of the district and of any new levees to be constructed and all other works of improvement for the benefit of the district, and shall divide the work into convenient sections. The plans and specifications shall be filed in the office of the board not later than the first day of July of each year and shall be subject to inspection by any interested person for at least two weeks prior to the letting of any contract for work in accordance with those plans and specifications. If the cost of repair or construction in any one of the sections will exceed five hundred dollars ($500) the board must, not later than the first day of July in each year, give notice by publication at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers printed and published in Sutter County, that sealed proposals will be received and opened at the office of the board, at a time specified in the notice, for the construction of repairs, new levees, and other works of improvement in each separate section of work, and for the whole work, in accordance with the plans and specifications. At the time and place specified in the notice the board shall publicly open the bids and let the contract or contracts to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders; provided, however, that the board may reject any bid. If any or all bids are rejected the board shall immediately readvertise for bids, as in the first instance, for work that has not been let and upon the opening and consideration of those new bids the board shall have the right to reject any of them and have the work done by day labor. Every person, firm or corporation to whom a contract is awarded shall enter into a bond with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, equal to one-half of the contract price, conditioned for the faithful performance of the contract in accordance with the plans and specifications.

(b) In cases of emergency, the board may, by unanimous consent of all the members, proceed at once to replace or repair any and all levees in the district without notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) In case of vacancy in the office of any director or directors of the district by reason of death, resignation, or other cause (whether the same shall occur before or after the effective date of this act), the board of supervisors of Sutter County shall have power to fill the same by appointment. A person so appointed to fill such a vacancy shall hold office until the first Monday in March following the next election in the district at which directors are to be elected and until his or her successor has been elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 62. Protection Districts [20940. - 20942.]

20940.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by protection districts as provided for in Chapter 201 of the Statutes of 1895.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

20941.

(a) All work done in any district shall be ordered by the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located and shall be under the direction of the county surveyor or county engineer. All work which exceeds an estimated cost of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be advertised and let to the lowest bidder; provided, however, that at the time of an emergency the board of supervisors may order emergency work done without advertising for bids. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board of supervisors shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(b) As soon as the district is formed, the board shall cause a survey of the contemplated improvements to be made, or adopt a survey already made, and shall also cause a map of the survey, and plans and specifications showing the improvements in detail, to be prepared, and they shall adopt those surveys, maps, plans, and specifications, and thereafter all improvements shall be made in accordance with the surveys, maps, plans, and specifications so adopted; provided, that at any time after the adoption of said surveys, maps, plans, and specifications, and before the commissioner’s report of assessment of benefits and award of damages has been finally adopted and confirmed by the board, the board may rescind their action in adopting those surveys, maps, plans, and specifications, and may modify the same or adopt others in their place, in which case a new assessment shall be made, or may, by a four-fifths vote of the members, abandon the contemplated improvement and dissolve the protection district, in which case the expenses already incurred on behalf of the district shall be a county charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20942.

The board of supervisors shall determine the amount of work to be done in each year and the place where such work is to be done, and may let a contract for any portion of such work that they may think proper. When the work is let by contract, either as a whole work or for a portion thereof, the board shall give notice, by publication thereof, not less than 10 days, in a newspaper published in such county, calling for bids for the construction of such work, or of any portion thereof; if less than the whole work is advertised, then the portion so advertised must be particularly described in such notice. Said notice shall set forth that plans and specifications can be seen at the office of the board, and that the board will receive sealed proposals therefor, and that the contract will be let to the lowest responsible bidder, stating the time and place for opening said proposal, and how such sealed proposals shall be addressed, which, at the time and place appointed, shall be opened, and, as soon thereafter as convenient, the board shall let said work, either in portions or as a whole, to the lowest responsible bidder; or they may reject any and all bids and readvertise for proposals. Any person or persons to whom a contract may be awarded shall enter into a bond, with good and sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, payable to said county for the use of such protection district, for double the amount of the contract price, conditioned for the faithful performance of said contract. The work shall be done under the direction and to the satisfaction of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 63. Drainage Districts [20950. - 20952.]

20950.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by drainage districts, as provided for in Chapter 238 of the Statutes of 1903.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

20951.

After adopting a plan for such conduits, drains, pumping plants, watergates, and other works which are provided for in this act, the board of directors shall give notice by publication thereof not less than 10 days as required in Section 6062a of the Government Code, in one newspaper published in each of the counties composing the district (provided, a newspaper is published therein) and in such other newspapers as they may deem advisable, calling for bids for the construction of such work, or of any portion thereof; if less than the whole work is advertised, then the portion so advertised must be particularly described in such notice. Said notice shall set forth that plans and specifications can be seen at the office of the board, and that the board will receive sealed proposals therefor, and that the contract will be let to the lowest responsible bidder, stating the time and place for opening said proposals, which, at the time and place appointed shall be opened in public; and as soon as convenient thereafter the board shall let said work, whether in portions or as a whole, to the lowest responsible bidder; or they may reject any or all bids and readvertise for proposals, or may proceed to construct the work under their own superintendence. Contracts for the purchase of material shall be awarded, or the board may reject any or all bids, and may readvertise for proposals. Any person or persons to whom a contract may be awarded shall enter into a bond, with good and sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, payable to said district for its use for 50 percent of the amount of the contract price, conditioned for the faithful performance of the contract. The work shall be done under the direction and to the satisfaction of the engineer, and be approved by the board.

Contracts under this section calling for an expenditure of less than three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) may be let without bid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

20952.

The district may enter into contracts or agreements with the State of California or other public districts for the joint construction of and for the joint use and maintenance of evaporation ponds or other works for the disposal of saline drainage waters and for the disposal of salts and other residues developed from the operation of such works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 64. Levee Districts [20960. - 20961.]

20960.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by levee districts as provided for in Chapter 310 of the Statutes of 1905.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

20961.

No levees, dikes, or other works for the benefit of the district may be constructed or repaired except on the order of the board of trustees of the district and when the repair or construction will exceed five hundred dollars ($500) the work may be performed only under a contract let, after reasonable notice given by the board of trustees by publishing the notice at least once a week for two weeks in a newspaper published and circulated in the county and designated by the board of trustees. All bids shall be sealed and shall be opened at the time specified in the notice, and the contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. The board may, however, reject any and all bids. The contract and bond for its performance must be entered into and approved by the board of trustees, except, however, in cases of emergency, by the unanimous consent of the whole board of trustees they may proceed at once to replace or repair levees, dikes, or other works without notice. In case of emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). Prior to the publication of the notice of the letting of any contract for the erection or repair of dikes, levees, or other works, the board of trustees shall have prepared by a competent engineer, plans and specifications and working details of the work, that shall be adopted by the board of trustees and filed in the office of the board and shall be subject to inspection by any person for at least two weeks prior to the date of the letting of the contract. The board of trustees shall appoint an engineer to supervise the construction, repair, or other works to be done under the plans and specifications and no claim shall be allowed for any work done under any contract let under those plans and specifications without a certificate being first filed in the office of the board of trustees and in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county signed by the engineer, certifying that the work has been completed and constructed according to the plans and specifications and the terms of the contract. The engineer shall be paid the compensation agreed upon by the board of trustees and the compensation shall be paid in the same manner as other claims against the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 65. Protection Districts [20970. - 20971.]

20970.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by protection districts as provided for in Chapter 25 of the Statutes of 1907.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

20971.
